North Carolina statutes. Chapter 81A. Weights and Measures Act of 1975.
Article 7. General Provisions.

§ 81A-86.
Regulations to be unaffected by repeal of prior enabling statute.

The adoption of this Chapter or any of its provisions shall not affect any regulations promulgated pursuant to the authority of any earlier enabling statute unless inconsistent with this Chapter or modified or revoked.

History.

1975, c. 544.

§ 81A-87.
Severability provision.

If any provision of this Chapter is declared unconstitutional, or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of the Chapter and the applicability thereof to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

History.

1975, c. 544.

§ 81A-88.
Repeal of conflicting laws.

All laws and parts of laws contrary to or inconsistent with the provisions of this Chapter are repealed except as to offenses committed, liabilities incurred, and claims made thereunder prior to July 1, 1976.

History.

1975, c. 544.